Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2866.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 12-1176, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE12-1176. Demand for jury; trial procedure A. If a jury trial is requested by the plaintiff, the court shall grant the request.  If the proceeding is in the superior court, the jury shall consist of eight persons, and if the proceeding is in the justice court, the jury shall consist of six persons. The trial date shall be no more than five at least fifteen judicial days after the aggrieved party files the complaint defendant is served with the summons and complaint. B. If the plaintiff does not request a jury, the defendant may do so on appearing and the request shall be granted. C. The action shall be docketed and tried as other civil actions. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 12-1178, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE12-1178. Judgment; writ of restitution; limitation on issuance; criminal violation; notice A. If the defendant is found guilty of forcible entry and detainer or forcible detainer, the court shall give judgment for the plaintiff for restitution of the premises, for all charges stated in the rental agreement and for damages, attorney fees, court and other costs and, at the plaintiff's option, all rent found to be due and unpaid through the periodic rental period, as described in section 33-1314, subsection C, as provided for in the rental agreement, and shall grant a writ of restitution. The person designated by the judge to prepare the judgment shall ensure that the defendant's social security number is not contained on the judgment. B. If the defendant is found not guilty of forcible entry and detainer or forcible detainer, judgment shall be given for the defendant against the plaintiff for damages, attorney fees and court and other costs, and if it appears that the plaintiff has acquired possession of the premises since commencement of the action, a writ of restitution shall issue in favor of the defendant. C. No a writ of restitution shall may not issue until the expiration of five fifteen calendar days after the rendition of judgment. The writ of restitution shall may be issued but may not be enforced as promptly and expeditiously as possible until at least twenty-four hours after the plaintiff provides notice to the defendant that the defendant will be served with the writ of restitution. The issuance or enforcement of a writ of restitution shall not be suspended, delayed or otherwise affected by the filing of a motion to set aside or vacate the judgment or similar motion unless a judge finds good cause. D. A defendant who is lawfully served with a writ of restitution and who remains in or returns to the dwelling unit, as defined in section 33-1310, or remains on or returns to the mobile home space, as defined in section 33-1409, or the recreational vehicle space, as defined in section 33-2102, without the express permission of the owner of the property or the person with lawful control of the property commits criminal trespass in the third degree pursuant to section 13-1502. E. If the defendant is found guilty of forcible entry and detainer or forcible detainer, the court shall give the defendant notice that a defendant who is lawfully served with a writ of restitution and who remains in or returns to the dwelling unit or remains on or returns to the mobile home space or the recreational vehicle space without the express permission of the owner of the property or the person with lawful control of the property commits criminal trespass in the third degree pursuant to section 13-1502. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 33-1368, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE33-1368. Noncompliance with rental agreement by tenant; failure to pay rent; utility discontinuation; liability for guests; definition A. Except as provided in this chapter, if there is a material noncompliance by the tenant with the rental agreement, including material falsification of the information provided on the rental application, the landlord may deliver a written notice to the tenant specifying the acts and omissions constituting the breach and that the rental agreement will terminate on a date not less than ten days after receipt of the notice if the breach is not remedied in ten days. For the purposes of this section, material falsification includes the following untrue or misleading information about the: 1. Number of occupants in the dwelling unit, pets, income of the prospective tenant, social security number and current employment listed on the application or lease agreement. 2. Tenant's criminal records, prior eviction record and current criminal activity. Material falsification of information in this paragraph is not curable under this section. If there is a noncompliance by the tenant with section 33-1341 materially affecting health and safety, the landlord may deliver a written notice to the tenant specifying the acts and omissions constituting the breach and that the rental agreement will terminate on a date not less than five fifteen days after receipt of the notice if the breach is not remedied in five fifteen days. However, If the breach is remediable by repair or the payment of damages or otherwise, and the tenant adequately remedies the breach before the date specified in the notice, the rental agreement will not terminate.  If there is an additional act of these types of noncompliance of the same or a similar nature during the term of the lease after the previous remedy of noncompliance, the landlord may institute a special detainer action pursuant to section 33-1377 ten days after delivery of a written notice advising the tenant that a second noncompliance of the same or a similar nature has occurred. If there is a breach that is both material and irreparable and that occurs on the premises, which may include an illegal discharge of a weapon, homicide as prescribed in sections 13-1102, 13-1103, 13-1104 and 13-1105, prostitution as defined in section 13-3211, criminal street gang activity as prescribed in section 13-105, activity as prohibited in section 13-2308, the unlawful manufacturing, selling, transferring, possessing, using or storing of a controlled substance as defined in section 13-3451, threatening or intimidating as prohibited in section 13-1202, assault as prohibited in section 13-1203, acts that have been found to constitute a nuisance pursuant to section 12-991 or a breach of the lease agreement that otherwise jeopardizes the health, safety and welfare of the landlord, the landlord's agent or another tenant or involving imminent or actual serious property damage, the landlord may deliver a written notice for immediate termination of the rental agreement and shall proceed under section 33-1377. The foregoing list of actions which may constitute a material and irreparable breach of a tenant's lease is not exhaustive. B. A tenant may not withhold rent for any reason not authorized by this chapter. If rent is unpaid when due, and the landlord shall provide the tenant with a preliminary four-day notice of nonpayment that includes a list of rental assistance resources. If the tenant does not pay the rent in full by the fourth day after the tenant RECEIVES the preliminary notice, the landlord shall deliver a ten-day notice to the tenant that states that if the tenant fails to pay rent within five fifteen days after written notice by the landlord of nonpayment, and it is the landlord's intention to terminate the rental agreement if the rent is not paid within that period of time, and the landlord may terminate the rental agreement by filing a special detainer action pursuant to section 33-1377. Before the filing of a special detainer action the rental agreement shall be reinstated if the tenant tenders all past due and unpaid periodic rent and a reasonable late fee set forth in a written rental agreement. After a special detainer action is filed the rental agreement is reinstated only if the tenant pays all past due rent, reasonable late fees set forth in a written rental agreement, attorney fees and court costs. After a judgment has been entered in a special detainer action in favor of the landlord, any reinstatement of the rental agreement is solely in the discretion of the landlord. C. The landlord may recover all reasonable damages resulting from noncompliance by the tenant with the rental agreement or section 33-1341 or occupancy of the dwelling unit, court costs, reasonable attorney fees and all quantifiable damage caused by the tenant to the premises. D. The landlord may discontinue utility services provided by the landlord on the day following the day that a writ of restitution or execution is executed pursuant to section 12-1181. Disconnections shall be performed only by a person authorized by the utility whose service is being discontinued. This section does not supersede standard tariff and operational procedures that apply to any public service corporation, municipal corporation or special districts providing utility services in this state. E. On the day following the day that a writ of restitution or execution is executed pursuant to section 12-1181, the landlord shall comply with section 33-1370, subsections D, E, F, G, H and I regarding the tenant's personal property. F. For the purposes of this chapter, the tenant shall be held responsible for the actions of the tenant's guests that violate the lease agreement or rules or regulations of the landlord if the tenant could reasonably be expected to be aware that such actions might occur and did not attempt to prevent those actions to the best of the tenant's ability. G. For the purposes of this section, "days" means calendar days. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Section 33-1377, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE33-1377. Special detainer actions; service; trial postponement A. Special detainer actions shall be instituted for remedies prescribed in section 33-1368. Except as provided in this section, the procedure and appeal rights prescribed in title 12, chapter 8, article 4 apply to special detainer actions. B. The summons shall be issued on the day the complaint is filed and shall command the person against whom the complaint is made to appear and answer the complaint at the time and place named, which shall be not more than six twenty nor less than three ten days from the date of that the tenant is served with the summons. The tenant is deemed to have received the summons three days after the summons is mailed if personal service is attempted and within one day of issuance of the summons a copy of the summons is conspicuously posted on the main entrance of the tenant's residence and on the same day the summons is sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the tenant's last known address. The summons in a special detainer action shall be served at least two eleven days before the return day and the return day made on the day assigned for trial to allow the tenant at least ten days to file an answer to the complaint. Service of process in this manner shall be deemed the equivalent of having served the tenant in person for the purposes of awarding a money judgment for all rent, damages, costs and attorney fees due. C. For good cause shown supported by an affidavit, the trial may be postponed for not more than three days in a justice court or five days in the superior court. The trial shall be postponed if the trial date is to be held before the expiration of the ten-day period for the tenant to file an answer to the complaint. D. In addition to determining the right to actual possession, the court may assess damages, attorney fees and costs as prescribed by law. E. If a complaint is filed alleging a material and irreparable breach pursuant to section 33-1368, subsection A, the summons shall be issued as provided in subsection B of this section, except that the trial date and return date shall be set no later than the third day following the filing of the complaint. If after the hearing the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the material and irreparable breach did occur, the court shall order restitution in favor of the plaintiff not less than twelve nor more than twenty-four hours later. F. If the defendant is found guilty, the court shall give judgment for the plaintiff for restitution of the premises, for late charges stated in the rental agreement, for costs and, at the plaintiff's option, for all rent found to be due and unpaid through the periodic rental period provided for in the rental agreement as described in section 33-1314, subsection C and shall grant a writ of restitution. G. If the defendant is found not guilty, judgment shall be given for the defendant against the plaintiff for costs, and if it appears that the plaintiff has acquired possession of the premises since commencement of the action, a writ of restitution shall issue in favor of the defendant. END_STATUTE